Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0728.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 507. (1) The commission may issue, without regard to the
quota provisions requirement of section 531, licenses to the owner
or lessee, or both, to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on
the premises of buildings in the passenger terminal complex of each
publicly owned airport that is served by scheduled commercial
passenger airlines certificated to enplane and deplane passengers
on a scheduled basis by the federal aviation agency or the civil
aeronautics board.Federal Aviation Administration.
(2) Notwithstanding anything in this act to the contrary, a
DAW S05062'25 (S-1) yfmpw4


customer who purchases alcoholic liquor from a licensee described
in subsection (1) or a licensee that holds both a license described
in subsection (1) and a specially designated merchant license
issued under section 533(5)(a) may possess and consume that
alcoholic liquor at any unlicensed place in the passenger terminal
complex subject to the approval of the governing body of the
publicly owned airport.
(3) A customer that purchases alcoholic liquor at a location
described in subsection (2) from a licensee shall not consume the
alcoholic liquor on the licensed premises of another licensee. A
licensee shall not allow the consumption of alcoholic liquor under
subsection (2) on its licensed premises if the alcoholic liquor was
not purchased from the licensee.
(4) A licensee shall not sell or serve alcoholic liquor under
subsection (2) to a customer outside of the licensed premises of
the licensee.
(5) A license issued under this section is not transferable.
Final Page
DAW S05062'25 (S-1) yfmpw4